Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 6 Acquisition of Land
37-6-24.
Conveyance of land in exchange for property taken — Construction on or improvement of land remaining to private owner.

Whenever in the opinion of the acquiring authority a substantial saving in the cost of acquiring title can be effected by conveying other land or other real property, title to which is in the state, to the person or persons from whom the estate or interest in land or other real property is being purchased or taken, or by the construction or improvement by the acquiring authority of any work or facility upon the remaining land or other real property of the person or persons from whom the estate or interest in land or other real property is being purchased or taken, the acquiring authority shall be and hereby is authorized and directed, with the approval of the state properties committee, to convey by instrument, approved as to substance by the director of administration and as to form by the attorney general, such other land or other real property of the state to the person or persons from whom the estate or interest in land or other real property is being purchased or taken, and to construct or improve any work or facility upon the remaining land of the person or persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-24

.

37-6-25.
Liberal construction — Technicalities — Severability.

The provisions of this chapter and §§

37-7-1

—

37-7-9

shall be construed liberally in order to accomplish the purposes hereof, and where any specific power is given to the state properties committee or the acquiring authority by the provisions thereof, the statement thereof shall not be held to exclude or impair any implied and incidental powers and such additional powers, not inconsistent with any express provisions of this chapter and §§

37-7-1

—

37-7-9

, which may constitutionally be conferred upon it, as may be proper and reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and §§ 37-7-1 — 37-7-9. No order, rule, regulation, or action of the state properties committee shall be declared inoperative, illegal, or void for any omission of a technical nature in respect thereto. If any provision of this chapter or §§ 37-7-1 — 37-7-9, or any order, rule, or regulation made or action performed under them, or the application of a provision to any person or under any circumstances shall be held invalid by a decision of any court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter and §§ 37-7-1 — 37-7-9, or of the order, rule, regulation, or action and the application of a provision to other persons or under other circumstances, shall not be affected by the decision. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter or of §§ 37-7-1 — 37-7-9, shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter and sections, and it is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that the chapter and sections would have been enacted if the invalid parts had not been included therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-25

.

37-6-26.
Acquisition of land for utility or railroad relocation necessitated by highway construction or improvement.

Whenever, in connection with the laying out, widening, relocating, improving, constructing, or altering of a highway by the department of transportation, land, an easement, or other interest therein owned by a public utility or railroad company, is acquired by the director of transportation under the provisions of this chapter, thereby necessitating the relocation of the facilities of the company, the director of transportation, subject to the provisions of this chapter, may acquire by purchase or may take by condemnation such land or easements therein as may be necessary for the relocation or replacement of the public utility or railroad facilities and convey the land or easements to the public utility or railroad company. The conveyance shall be in lieu of any damages for the value of the land, easements, or other interests therein of the company so taken by the director of transportation, not including, however, any damages for the cost of the relocation for which the state may be liable.

For the purposes of this section, the term “public utility” shall embrace the definition therefor contained within §

39-1-2

and, in addition, shall include any public water works or water service owned or furnished by any municipal or quasi-municipal corporation or authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 49, § 1.

37-6-27.
Use of state property for city park purposes.

The state properties committee may, upon receipt of a request from a city or town, permit the use of state owned property within the city or town for park or recreational purposes. The city or town receiving permission to use state property shall be responsible for its maintenance and care.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to pass the legal title of any property to a city or town when permission for use is granted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 110, § 1.

37-6-28.
Compliance with federal law.

The state of Rhode Island and any and all of its agencies and departments are hereby authorized to comply fully with the pertinent provisions of the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Land Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, 42 U.S.C. § 4601 et seq., and any subsequent amendments thereto, by making all of the payments authorized and set forth in the federal act and by providing any and all of the services as set forth in the federal act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 225, § 2.

37-6-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 555, § 5; P.L. 1994, ch. 258, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2003, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 17, 2003. For present comparable provisions, see §

37-6-23

.

37-6-30.
Registry of leases.

The chief purchasing officer as defined in subsection

37-2-7(3)

shall cause to be established a registry of leases which shall be indexed and copies shall be kept of all leases entered into by the state or any of its agencies. The state and any department, board, bureau, commission, officer, or agency of the state entering into a lease agreement shall submit a copy of the lease to the chief purchasing officer for inclusion in the registry of leases no later than three (3) business days after execution of the lease. The registry shall index leases by property location, name and address of lessor and lessee, date of execution, and date of expiration. The registry shall contain certificates of compliance issued by all public corporations and quasi-public agencies that have fulfilled the requirements of subsection (c) herein. All leases entered into the registry on or after July 1, 2008 shall remain in the registry for five (5) years subsequent to the date of expiration of the lease. The chief purchasing officer shall maintain the registry of leases and copies of the registry and all leases and certificates of compliance contained therein shall be made available for public inspection. The chief purchasing officer shall post on the division’s website the registry of leases and each lease contained therein no later than three (3) business days after receipt of each lease.

The chief purchasing officer shall electronically transmit the registry of leases and certificates of compliance to the secretary of state for posting online, in accordance with rules and regulations which shall be promulgated by the secretary of state. Thereafter, the chief purchasing officer shall electronically transmit to the secretary of state for posting online, each lease and certificate of compliance described in subsection (a) no later than three (3) business days after receipt of the lease. This requirement of electronic transmission of the registry of leases and subsequently executed leases and certificates of compliance with the secretary of state shall take effect on January 1, 2009.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, including any provision exempting any entity from the requirements of this chapter, all public corporations as defined in subsection

35-20-5(4)

and quasi-public agencies shall cause to be established a registry of all its leases which shall be indexed, and copies shall be kept of all such leases. Each public corporation or quasi-public agency shall maintain a registry of its leases and copies of the registry and all leases contained therein shall be made available for public inspection. The public corporation or quasi-public agency shall post on its website the registry of leases and each lease contained therein no later than three (3) business days after execution of each lease. The registry shall index leases by property location, name and address of lessor and lessee, date of execution, and date of expiration. All leases entered into the registry on or after July 1, 2008 shall remain in the registry for five (5) years subsequent to the date of expiration. The public corporation or quasi-public agency shall electronically transmit the registry of leases to the secretary of state for posting online, in accordance with rules and regulations which shall be promulgated by the secretary of state. Thereafter, the public corporation or quasi-public agency shall electronically transmit to the secretary of state for posting online, each lease described herein no later than three (3) business days after the execution of the lease. Once the electronic transmission has been completed, the public corporation or quasi-public agency shall issue no later than three (3) business days after the execution of the lease a certificate stating its compliance with the requirements of this subsection to the chief purchasing officer. This requirement of electronic transmission of the registry of leases and subsequently executed leases with the secretary of state shall take effect on January 1, 2009.

The secretary of state shall maintain, on the agency’s website, an online database of leases and certificates of compliance required by this chapter. The online database shall be organized to promote transparency and be easily accessible to the public. The online database shall be searchable by property, location, name and address of lessor and lessee, date of execution, and date of expiration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 462, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 310, § 21.